Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1574
Discovery of property of debtor; receiver; liability of officer and sureties; undertaking; oath.

If the sheriff shall be appointed receiver, he and his sureties shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful discharge of his duties as such receiver; if any other person shall be appointed receiver, he shall give a written undertaking, in such sum as shall be prescribed by the judge, with one or more sureties, to the effect that he will faithfully discharge his duties of receiver, and he shall also take an oath to the same effect before acting as such receiver. The undertaking mentioned in this section shall be to the State of Nebraska, and actions may be prosecuted for a breach thereof, by any person interested, in the same manner as upon a sheriff's official bond.

R.S.1867, Code § 543, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8122;

C.S.1922, § 9058;

C.S.1929, § 20-1576;

R.S.1943, § 25-1574.